Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 26
SALE OF WATER RIGHTS

Sec.

§ 42-2601. Petition for certificate of authority to sell water rights. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 42-2602. Examination of works by department of water resources. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 42-2603. Jurisdiction of department of water resources. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 42-2604. Water contracts and deeds. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 42-2605. Penalties for unauthorized sale of water rights. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 42-2606. Expenses payable from Carey Act trust fund. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 42-2607. Irrigation districts exempted. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 42-2608. Annual statement. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.